Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE E. BENEFITS PAYABLE UNDER HEALTH COVERAGES

CHAPTER 1371. COVERAGE FOR CERTAIN PROSTHETIC DEVICES, ORTHOTIC DEVICES, AND RELATED SERVICES

Sec. 1371.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Enrollee" means an individual entitled to coverage under a health benefit plan.

(2) "Orthotic device" means a custom-fitted or custom-fabricated medical device that is applied to a part of the human body to correct a deformity, improve function, or relieve symptoms of a disease.

(3) "Prosthetic device" means an artificial device designed to replace, wholly or partly, an arm or leg.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 806), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1371.002. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. (a) This chapter applies only to a health benefit plan, including a small employer health benefit plan written under Chapter 1501 or coverage provided by a health group cooperative under Subchapter B of that chapter, that provides benefits for medical or surgical expenses incurred as a result of a health condition, accident, or sickness, including an individual, group, blanket, or franchise insurance policy or insurance agreement, a group hospital service contract, or an individual or group evidence of coverage or similar coverage document that is offered by:

(1) an insurance company;

(2) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842;

(3) a fraternal benefit society operating under Chapter 885;

(4) a stipulated premium company operating under Chapter 884;

(5) a reciprocal exchange operating under Chapter 942;

(6) a Lloyd's plan operating under Chapter 941;

(7) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843;

(8) a multiple employer welfare arrangement that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 846; or

(9) an approved nonprofit health corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 844.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision in Chapter 1551, 1575, 1579, or 1601 or any other law, this chapter applies to:

(1) a basic coverage plan under Chapter 1551;

(2) a basic plan under Chapter 1575;

(3) a primary care coverage plan under Chapter 1579; and

(4) basic coverage under Chapter 1601.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 806), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1371.003. REQUIRED COVERAGE FOR PROSTHETIC DEVICES, ORTHOTIC DEVICES, AND RELATED SERVICES. (a) A health benefit plan must provide coverage for prosthetic devices, orthotic devices, and professional services related to the fitting and use of those devices that equals the coverage provided under federal laws for health insurance for the aged and disabled under Sections 1832, 1833, and 1834, Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sections 1395k, 1395l, and 1395m), and 42 C.F.R. Sections 410.100, 414.202, 414.210, and 414.228, as applicable.

(b) Covered benefits under this chapter are limited to the most appropriate model of prosthetic device or orthotic device that adequately meets the medical needs of the enrollee as determined by the enrollee's treating physician or podiatrist and prosthetist or orthotist, as applicable.

(c) Subject to applicable copayments and deductibles, the repair and replacement of a prosthetic device or orthotic device is a covered benefit under this chapter unless the repair or replacement is necessitated by misuse or loss by the enrollee.

(d) Coverage required under this section:

(1) must be provided in a manner determined to be appropriate in consultation with the treating physician or podiatrist and prosthetist or orthotist, as applicable, and the enrollee;

(2) may be subject to annual deductibles, copayments, and coinsurance that are consistent with annual deductibles, copayments, and coinsurance required for other coverage under the health benefit plan; and

(3) may not be subject to annual dollar limits.

(e) Covered benefits under this chapter may be provided by a pharmacy that has employees who are qualified under the Medicare system and applicable Medicaid regulations to service and bill for orthotic services. This chapter does not preclude a pharmacy from being reimbursed by a health benefit plan for the provision of orthotic services.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 806), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1371.004. PREAUTHORIZATION. A health benefit plan may require prior authorization for a prosthetic device or an orthotic device in the same manner that the health benefit plan requires prior authorization for any other covered benefit.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 806), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1371.005. MANAGED CARE PLAN. A health benefit plan provider may require that, if coverage is provided through a managed care plan, the benefits mandated under this chapter are covered benefits only if the prosthetic devices or orthotic devices are provided by a vendor or a provider, and related services are rendered by a provider, that contracts with or is designated by the health benefit plan provider. If the health benefit plan provider provides in-network and out-of-network services, the coverage for prosthetic devices or orthotic devices provided through out-of-network services must be comparable to that provided through in-network services.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 806), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.